Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6816
Performance period, defined.

Performance period means the year during which the required increases in employment and investment were met or exceeded and each year thereafter until the end of the sixth year after the year the required increases were met or exceeded.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 16.